pl: Konstrukcja liny: Pojedynczy splot 12-żyłowy; 3-żyłowa skręcana; 8-żyłowa (octoplait); Podwójny splot (braid-on-braid); Lina o splocie rurkowym; Lina rdzeniowa (rdzeń / oplot); Rdzeń równoległy; Splot pełny (solid braid); Inna
bg-BG: Конструкция на въжето: 12-нишкова единична оплетка; 3-нишкова усукана; 8-нишкова сплетена (octoplait); Двойна оплетка; Куха оплетка; Kernmantle (сърцевина/броня); Паралелна сърцевина; Плътна оплетка; Друго
es: Construcción de la cuerda: Trenzado simple de 12 cordones; Torsión de 3 cordones; Trenzado de 8 cabos (octoplait); Trenzado doble (trenza sobre trenza); Trenzado hueco; Kernmantle (alma/funda); Alma paralela; Trenzado sólido; Otro
ko: 로프 구조: 12가닥 싱글 브레이드; 3가닥 꼬임; 8가닥 땋기(옥토플라이트); 이중 브레이드(브레이드 온 브레이드); 할로우 브레이드; 컨맨틀(코어/외피); 패러렐 코어; 솔리드 브레이드; 기타
fr: Structure de la corde: Tresse simple à 12 brins; Torsadé à 3 brins; 8 brins (octoplait); Double tresse; Tresse creuse; Gaine et âme (kernmantle); Âme parallèle; Tresse pleine; Autre
lt-LT: Virvės konstrukcija: 12 gijų viengubo pynimo; 3 gijų suktas; 8 gijų pynimo („octoplait“); Dvigubo pynimo (pynimas pynime); Tuščiavidurio pynimo; „Kernmantle“ (šerdis / apvalkalas); Lygiagreti šerdis; Vientiso pynimo; Kita
de: Leinenart: 12-fach geflochten (einfach); 3-fach gedreht; 8-fach geflochten (Octoplait); Doppelt geflochten (Braid-on-Braid); Hohlgeflecht; Kernmantel (Kern/Mantel); Parallelkern; Vollgeflecht; Sonstige
hu: Kötél szerkezete: 12 pászmás szimpla fonat; 3 pászmás sodrott; 8 pászmás (octoplait); Dupla fonat (fonat a fonaton); Üreges fonat; Kernmantle (mag/köpeny); Párhuzamos mag; Tömör fonat; Egyéb
vi: Kết cấu dây thừng: Tết đơn 12 tao; Xoắn 3 tao; Tết 8 tao (octoplait); Tết đôi (tết chồng tết); Tết rỗng; Kernmantle (lõi/vỏ); Lõi song biến; Tết đặc; Khác
ru: Конструкция веревки: 12-прядная одинарная оплетка; 3-прядная витая; 8-прядная плетеная (octoplait); Двойная оплетка; Полая оплетка; Кернмантл (сердечник/оплетка); Параллельный сердечник; Сплошная оплетка; Другое
da: Rebkonstruktion: 12-strenget enkelt fletning; 3-slået snoet; 8-flettet (octoplait); Dobbeltflettet (flet på flet); Hulflettet; Kernmantel (kerne/kappe); Parallelkerne; Fastflettet; Andet
zh-TW: 繩索結構: 12 股單編織; 3 股絞編; 8 股編織 (八股編); 雙層編織 (編中編); 空心編織; 夾心繩 (內芯/外鞘); 平行內芯; 實心編織; 其他
it: Costruzione della corda: Treccia singola a 12 capi; Ritorta a 3 capi; A 8 legnoli (octoplait); Doppia treccia (treccia su treccia); Treccia cava; Kernmantle (anima/calza); Anima parallela; Treccia solida; Altro
pt-PT: Construção da corda: Trança simples de 12 cordões; Torcida de 3 cordões; Trançado de 8 cordões (octoplait); Trança dupla (trança sobre trança); Trança oca; Kernmantle (núcleo/bainha); Núcleo paralelo; Trança sólida; Outro
nb: Taukonstruksjon: 12-trådet enkel fletting; 3-trådet vridd; 8-trådet krysstvinnet (octoplait); Dobbel fletting (flette i flette); Hul fletting; Kjernemantel (kjerne/strømpe); Parallell kjerne; Massiv fletting; Annet
cs: Konstrukce lana: 12pramenné jednoduché pletení; 3pramenné kroucené; 8pramenné pletené; Dvojité pletení (opletené jádro); Duté pletení; Opletené lano s jádrem; Paralelní jádro; Plné pletení; Jiné
fi: Köyden rakenne: 12-säikeinen yksittäispunos; 3-säikeinen kierretty; 8-säikeinen (octoplait); Kaksoispunos (braid-on-braid); Ontto punos; Kernmantle (ydin/mantteli); Rinnakkainen ydin; Umpipunos; Muu
sv: Repkonstruktion: 12-flätad (enkel fläta); 3-slagen; 8-flätad (octoplait); Dubbelflätad; Hålflätad; Kärnmantel (kärna/mantel); Parallellkärna; Massivt flätad; Övrigt
tr: Halat yapısı: 12 kollu tek örgü; 3 kollu bükülü; 8 katlı (sekizgen örgü); Çift örgü (örgü üstüne örgü); İçi boş örgü; Kernmantle (çekirdek/kılıf); Paralel çekirdek; Dolu örgü; Diğer
pt-BR: Corda, construção: Trança simples de 12 cordões; Torcida de 3 cordões; Trançada de 8 cordões (octoplait); Trança dupla (trança sobre trança); Trança oca; Kernmantle (alma/capa); Alma paralela; Trança sólida; Outra
hr-HR: Konstrukcija užeta: 12-nitno jednostruko pleteno; 3-nitno uvijeno; 8-nitno pleteno; Dvostruko pleteno (pletenica na pletenici); Šuplje pleteno; Kernmantel (jezgra/košuljica); Paralelna jezgra; Puno pleteno; Ostalo
ro-RO: Construcția frânghiei: Împletitură simplă din 12 șuvițe; Răsucită din 3 șuvițe; În 8 fire (octoplait); Împletitură dublă (braid-on-braid); Împletitură goală la interior; Kernmantle (miez/cămașă); Miez paralel; Împletitură solidă; Altele
sk-SK: Konštrukcia lana: 12-pramenné jednoduché pletenie; 3-pramenné stočené; 8-pramenné pletenie (octoplait); Dvojité pletenie (oplet na oplete); Duté pletenie; Kernmantle (jadro/oplet); Paralelné jadro; Plné pletenie; Iné
ja: ロープ構造: 12 ストランドシングルブレード; 3 ストランドツイスト; 8 プラット (オクトプラット); ダブルブレード (ブレードオンブレード); ホローブレード; カーンマントル (コア / シース); パラレルコア; ソリッドブレード; その他
en: Rope construction: 12-strand single braid; 3-strand twisted; 8-plait (octoplait); Double braid (braid-on-braid); Hollow braid; Kernmantle (core/sheath); Parallel core; Solid braid; Other
sl-SI: Plovnost vrvi: 12-pramenska enojna pletenica; 3-pramenska sukana; 8-pramenska (oktoplet); Dvojna pletenica; Votla pletenica; Oplaščena vrv (jedro/plašč); Vzporedno jedro; Polna pletenica; Drugo
th: โครงสร้างเชือก: ถักชั้นเดียว 12 เส้น; เกลียว 3 เส้น; ถัก 8 เส้น; ถักซ้อน (Braid-on-braid); ถักกลวง; เคิร์นแมนเทิล (แกน/ปลอก); แกนขนาน; ถักตัน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 锚绳结构: 12 股单编; 3 股绞合; 8 股编织; 双重编织（绳包绳）; 空心编织; 夹芯（内芯/外皮）; 平行芯; 实心编织; 其他
el: Κατασκευή σχοινιού: Μονή πλέξη 12 κλώνων; Στριφτό 3 κλώνων; 8 κλώνων (octoplait); Διπλή πλέξη (braid-on-braid); Κούφια πλέξη; Kernmantle (πυρήνας/περίβλημα); Παράλληλος πυρήνας; Συμπαγής πλέξη; Άλλο
nl: Touwconstructie: 12-strengs enkel gevlochten; 3-strengs geslagen; 8-strengs gevlochten (octoplait); Dubbel gevlochten (braid-on-braid); Hol gevlochten; Kernmantel (kern/mantel); Parallelle kern; Massief gevlochten; Overige